Florida, session 2026, HB1043.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 456.65, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
456.65 Doula Workforce Development Support Program.—
(1) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—
(a) The Legislature finds that maternal health challenges
are worsening in this state as it continues to see increased
maternal mortality and morbidity rates. Minority families face
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1043-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1043 2026
the highest disparities, with Black women experiencing death
rates 2 to 3 times higher than their White counterparts.
(b) The Legislature finds that doulas have been shown to
improve maternal and infant health outcomes, reduce preventable
complications, increase prenatal care engagement, and strengthen
postpartum recovery.
(c) The Legislature further finds that existing doula
training organizations, community-based doula programs,
nonprofit entities, and private educational institutions serve a
critical role in building a maternal health workforce but are
under-resourced. Supporting these entities through the state's
workforce development infrastructure is essential to meeting
regional maternal health needs, especially in urban high-
disparity counties, rural maternity-care deserts, and regions
experiencing hospital closures or obstetric service reductions.
(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to expand this
state's doula workforce, especially in rural, minority, and
other underserved communities, through strategic investment in
the entities best positioned to train and deploy doulas.
(2) ESTABLISHMENT AND PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM.—
(a) The Doula Workforce Development Support Program is
established within the Department of Commerce to fund,
strengthen, and expand existing doula training programs, doula
organizations, and community-based birthing services providers.
(b) The program must prioritize support for entities
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1043-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1043 2026
serving high-need regions, including:
1. Urban counties with high maternal morbidity
disparities.
2. Rural areas with limited or no obstetric providers or
maternity wards.
3. Communities affected by recent hospital closures or
reductions in maternity services.
(3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Department" means the Department of Economic
Opportunity.
(b) "Doula" means a nonmedical birth support professional
trained to give physical and emotional support in childbirth.
(c) "Doula training entity" means a nonprofit organization,
community-based program, training collective, academic
institution, or private educational provider that conducts doula
training, mentoring, continuing education, or workforce
placement activities.
(d) "Doula workforce support services" includes instructor
compensation, curriculum development, program expansion,
administrative support, business development training for
doulas, mentoring, apprenticeship structures, evaluation and
data activities, and related capacity-building functions.
(e) "High-need region" means a county or region identified
by the department as having elevated maternal morbidity rates,
limited maternity care providers, or insufficient doula
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1043-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1043 2026
availability.
(4) GRANTS, ELIGIBILITY, USE OF FUNDS.—The department may
award competitive or formula-based grants to eligible doula
training entities to support doula workforce development.
(a) Grant funds may be used for:
1. Training, mentoring, or apprenticeship program
expansion.
2. Instructor compensation and curriculum modernization.
3. Recruitment and support of trainees from high-need
regions.
4. Program administration, evaluation, and outreach.
5. Business development training for doulas, including
assistance with incorporation, insurance, marketing, and
entrepreneurship.
6. Stipends or workforce support for newly trained doulas,
administered through the eligible entity.
7. Partnership development with hospitals, Medicaid
managed care plans, clinics, community health workers, Healthy
Start Coalitions, or other maternal health providers.
(b) The department may not use funds to directly recruit,
hire, or employ doulas as state employees or contractors
providing clinical services.
(5) PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION.—The department shall establish
application procedures, grant criteria, allowable costs,
100 reporting requirements, and monitoring processes. In developing
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1043-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1043 2026
101 grant criteria, the department shall consider all of the
102 following:
103 (a) The demonstrated capacity of the entity to train or
104 mentor doulas.
105 (b) The geographic areas served and the documented need
106 for doula workforce expansion.
107 (c) The entity's experience serving culturally diverse and
108 high-disparity populations.
109 (d) Partnerships with local workforce development boards
110 or educational institutions.
111 (e) Plans for sustainability and long-term workforce
112 placement.
113 (6) REPORTS.—
114 (a) By December 1 of each year, the department shall
115 submit a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate,
116 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives that includes
117 all of the following information:
118 1. Grant recipients and award amounts.
119 2. The number of doulas trained, mentored, or supported by
120 funded entities.
121 3. The geographic distribution of program activities.
122 4. Workforce outcomes, including business development
123 successes and job placements.
124 5. Recommendations for program improvements.
125 (b) The department may require grant recipients to submit
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1043-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1043 2026
126 data necessary to compile the report.
127 (7) RULES.—The department may adopt rules to implement
128 this section.
129 Section 2. (1) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the
130 nonrecurring sum of $7.5 million from the General Revenue Fund
131 is appropriated to the Department of Economic Opportunity to
132 implement s. 456.65, Florida Statutes, relating to the Doula
133 Workforce Development Support Program.
134 (2) From the funds appropriated in subsection (1):
135 (a) Up to $500,000 may be used by the department for
136 administrative expenses, program management, technical
137 assistance to grantees, and data collection and evaluation
138 activities necessary to carry out the program.
139 (b) The remaining funds shall be placed in a grants and
140 aids for doula workforce development support category and
141 distributed as competitive or formula-based grants to eligible
142 doula training entities in accordance with s. 456.65, Florida
143 Statutes, with priority given to entities serving high-need
144 regions as defined in that section.
145 (3) Any appropriated funds that have not been expended or
146 encumbered by June 30, 2027, shall revert to the General Revenue
147 Fund.
148 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1043-00